Washington statutes.
RCW 19.174.060

Notice to customer.

The issuer of an access device shall furnish a customer receiving the device with a notice of basic safety precautions that the customer should employ while using an automated teller machine or night deposit facility. This information must be furnished by personally delivering or by mailing the information to each customer whose mailing address is in this state for the account to which the access device relates. This information must be furnished for an access device issued on or after July 1, 1994, at or before the time the customer is furnished with his or her access device. For a customer to whom an access device was issued before July 1, 1994, the information must be delivered or mailed to the customer on or before December 31, 1994. Only one notice must be furnished per household, and if an access device is furnished to more than one customer for a single account or set of accounts or on the basis of a single application or other request for the access devices, only a single notice must be furnished in satisfaction of the notification responsibilities as to all those customers. The information may be included with other disclosures related to the access device furnished to the customer, such as with an initial or periodic disclosure statement furnished under the Electronic Fund Transfer Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601, et seq.

[ 1993 c 324 s 6.]